Missouri, session 2026, SB1706.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 84.730, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 84.730,
to read as follows:
84.730. 1. (1) It shall be the duty of the board, on
the fifteenth day of January of each year, to prepare, in
writing, a budget estimating the sum of money which will be
necessary for the next fiscal year, to enable the board to
discharge the duties hereby imposed upon it, and to meet the
expenses of the police department, which it shall forthwith
certify to the governing body of such cities, and the budget
shall itemize purposes of expenditure by organization units,
activities, functions, and character classes in not less
detail than "personal services", "contractual services",
"commodities", and "capital outlays", and shall in any event
be prepared in form and detail similar to the form and
detail in which budgets for the various departments of such
city government are prepared. The governing body of the
cities is hereby required to appropriate the total amount so
certified, payable out of the revenue of the cities after
first having deducted the amount necessary to pay the
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1706 2
interest on the indebtedness of the cities, the amount
necessary for lighting the city, and any sum required by law
to be placed to the credit of the sinking fund of the
cities[, and].
(2) If the board shall be required to call out extra
police force and the expense thereof shall not have been
contemplated in their estimate for the fiscal year during
which the extra police force is called out, it shall
immediately certify the expense of such additional force,
and the additional amount so required shall be appropriated
for that purpose, except that in no event shall the
governing body of the cities be required to appropriate for
the use of the police board in any fiscal year an amount in
excess of one-fourth of the general revenue fund of such
year.
2. The general assembly shall appropriate for each
fiscal year an amount of moneys equal to the amount that was
appropriated by any such city in the city's previous fiscal
year for use of the police board to fund the police
department of such city.
✓